Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Contracts for Payments in Lieu of Other Taxes.

Sec. 43.82.010.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to

encourage new investment to develop the state’s stranded gas resources by authorizing establishment of fiscal terms related to that new investment without significantly altering tax and royalty methodologies and rates on existing oil and gas infrastructure and production;

allow the fiscal terms applicable to a qualified sponsor or the members of a qualified sponsor group, with respect to a qualified project, to be tailored to the particular economic conditions of the project and to establish those fiscal terms in advance with as much certainty as the Constitution of the State of Alaska allows; and

maximize the benefit to the people of the state of the development of the state’s stranded gas resources.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.020.
Contracts for payments in lieu of other taxes and for royalty adjustments.

The commissioner may, under this chapter, negotiate terms for inclusion in a proposed contract with a qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group providing for

periodic payment in lieu of one or more taxes that otherwise would be imposed by the state or a municipality on the qualified sponsor or members of the qualified sponsor group as a consequence of the sponsor’s or group’s participation in an approved qualified project under this chapter; and

certain adjustments regarding royalty under AS

43.82.220

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)